West Virginia, session 2026, HB5055.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-35. Period during which license valid. Licenses and permits provided by this chapter shall be valid through the last day of the calendar year for which they are issued a year from the date of issue unless otherwise provided by law.